Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 16. Drug Donation Program

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 2, appropriates $23,200 from the general fund to the department of health and authorizes one additional part-time position for the department of health to carry out the purposes of the act.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 35-7-1601.
Short title.

This act [§§

35-7-1601

through

35-7-1606

] shall be known and may be cited as the “Drug Donation Program Act”.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 35-7-1602.
Definitions.

For purposes of this act [§§

35-7-1601

through

35-7-1606

]:

“Prescription drug” means a pharmaceutical drug which is required by any applicable federal or state law to be dispensed only pursuant to a health care provider’s prescription;

“Health care facility” means as defined in W.S. 35-2-901(a)(x) and that is additionally authorized to maintain an inventory of pharmaceutical drugs for dispensing to the facility’s patients or residents;

“Department” means the department of health.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 1; 2018 ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (a)(iii) and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-7-1603.
Drug donation, redispensing and disposal program established; minimum requirements.

The department shall establish pursuant to its rules and regulations a voluntary drug donation and disposal program as provided in this section.

The drug donation and redispensing program shall have the following features:

Any person or entity, including but not limited to a drug manufacturer, physician or health care facility, may donate drugs to the drug donation program;

Drugs may be donated at a donation site maintained by the department, a take back event approved by the United States drug enforcement agency or at a physician’s office, a pharmacy or a health care facility that elects to participate in the program and meets criteria established by the department;

Drugs shall be redispensed under the drug donation program only if they are in their original, unopened, sealed packaging or, if the outside packaging is opened, the contents are single unit doses that are individually contained in unopened, tamper evident packaging;

A drug shall not be redispensed within two (2) months of its expiration date or if the drug appears to be adulterated or misbranded in any way;

Drugs in the donation program may be dispensed under the Medical Assistance and Services Act;

Drugs shall be delivered either to the department’s central collection facility, a take back event approved by the United States drug enforcement agency or one (1) of its regional collection facilities;

Drugs available for redispensing shall be inventoried and posted on a list of drugs available for redispensing on the department’s internet website;

The department shall provide access to computer systems and technical assistance to aid individuals in applying for government and private prescription drug programs and discounts.

To the extent authorized by applicable federal law, the drug drop off and disposal program shall have the following features:

Drop off locations shall be located with donation sites as provided in paragraph (b)(ii) of this section or local law enforcement agencies approved by the United States drug enforcement agency to the extent necessary under federal law;

Procedures shall be maintained for the documentation of all collected unused medication;

Procedures shall be maintained for the environmentally safe disposal of unused medications;

The department shall provide for public education of potential participating consumers about the availability of the drug disposal program and proper and effective disposal of unused medications;

The department shall cooperate with law enforcement agencies to the extent required for the collection under law enforcement supervision or the secure collection, storage, transport and destruction of controlled substances.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 1; 2009, ch. 166, § 1; 2016 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), inserted “and disposal” following “voluntary drug donation” and substituted “as provided in this section” for “which allows designated providers to accept and dispense donated medications to Wyoming residents”; inserted “and redispensing” following “donation” in the introductory language of (b);
inserted “a donation site maintained by the department, a take back event approved by the United States drug enforcement agency or at” following “Drugs may be donated at” and made a
stylistic change in (b)(ii); substituted “redispensed” for “accepted or dispensed” in (b)(iii); substituted “redispensed within two (2) months of its expiration date or if” for “accepted or dispensed if it bears an expiration date that is earlier than six months after the date the drug was donated or” in (b)(iv); added (b)(vi) and (b)(vii); and added (c).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “To the extent authorized by applicable federal law” at the beginning of (c).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added (b)(viii).

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See

42-4-101

et seq.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2009, ch. 166, § 2, provides: “(a) There is appropriated one hundred twenty-eight thousand six hundred ninety-six dollars ($128,696.00) from the general fund to the department of health. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of the drug collection, redispensing and disposal program pursuant to W.S. 35 7 1603. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.

”(b) The department of health is authorized one (1) additional full-time equivalent position to implement the purposes of this act.”

§ 35-7-1604.
Program participants.

A physician, pharmacy or health care facility that accepts donated drugs under the drug donation program shall comply with all applicable provisions of state and federal law relating to the storage, distribution and dispensing of such drugs and shall inspect all donated drugs prior to dispensing to determine if they appear to be adulterated or misbranded in any way.

Donated drugs may be distributed to another participating physician, pharmacy or health care facility for dispensing.

Donated drugs shall only be dispensed to a patient pursuant to prescription as required by law.

A physician, pharmacy or health care facility may charge a handling fee for distributing or dispensing drugs under the drug donation program, as established by department rules and regulations, but shall not otherwise resell or charge for donated drugs.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 1.

§ 35-7-1605.
Participant immunity.

In the absence of bad faith, any person who participates in donating, accepting, distributing or dispensing drugs under this act and in accordance with federal law shall be immune from civil or criminal liability or professional disciplinary action of any kind for any related injury, death or loss. No person, in the absence of bad faith, shall be liable for the bad faith of another relating to the provisions of this act.

The immunity provided by this section shall not decrease or increase the civil or criminal liability of a drug manufacturer, distributor or dispenser that would have existed but for the donation.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 1; 2009, ch. 166, § 1; 2016 ch. 57, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added “In the absence of bad faith, any” at the beginning, substituted “participates in donating” for “exercises reasonable care in donating”, and added the second sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “and in accordance with federal law” following “drugs under this act” in (a).

§ 35-7-1606.
Rules and regulations; agency cooperation.

The department, in cooperation with the Wyoming board of pharmacy, shall promulgate rules and regulations implementing the drug donation program established by this act [§§

35-7-1601

through

35-7-1606

]. Initial rules shall be promulgated within ninety (90) days after the effective date of this act and shall include:

Eligibility criteria and other standards and procedures for participating physicians and health care facilities;

Necessary forms for administration of the drug donation program, including forms for persons donating, accepting, distributing or dispensing drugs under the program;

Maximum handling fees;

Categories of drugs that the program will and will not accept.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 158, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.